New York, session 2025-2026, S8107.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 20 of section 9-0105 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as renumbered by chapter 554 of the laws of 1993, is 3 renumbered subdivision 21 and a new subdivision 20 is added to read as 4 follows: 5 20. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 6 authorize the use of class one bicycles with electric assist on any 7 preserves, parks and other state lands described in this article on 8 which the department has authorized the use of bicycles without electric 9 assist. Such class one bicycles with electric assist shall be authorized 10 to be used in the same locations and in the same manner as such bicycles 11 without electric assist are authorized to be used. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11764-01-5